Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.203

Recall sufficiency hearing—Payment of defense expenses.

The necessary expenses of defending an elective city or town official in a judicial hearing to determine the sufficiency of a recall charge as provided in RCW 29A.56.140 shall be paid by the city or town if the official requests such defense and approval is granted by the city or town council. The expenses paid by the city or town may include costs associated with an appeal of the decision rendered by the superior court concerning the sufficiency of the recall charge.

[ 2015 c 53 s 34; 1989 c 250 s 2.]